test/src/morphology/N-sosed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - сосед M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      сосед+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: сосе́д
      сосед+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: сосе́да
      сосед+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: сосе́да
      сосед+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: сосе́де
      сосед+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: сосе́ду
      сосед+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: сосе́дом
      сосед+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: сосе́ди
      сосед+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Anim: сосе́дей
      сосед+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: сосе́дей
      сосед+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: сосе́дях
      сосед+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: сосе́дям
      сосед+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: сосе́дями
